Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 8

Dissolution

61-3-801. Events causing dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved, and its activities and affairs must be wound up, upon the occurrence of any of the following:

An event or circumstance that the partnership agreement states causes dissolution;

The affirmative vote or consent of all general partners and of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective;

After the dissociation of a person as a general partner:

If the limited partnership has at least one (1) remaining general partner, by partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective; or

If the limited partnership does not have a remaining general partner, the passage of ninety (90) days after the dissociation, unless before the end of the period:

Consent to continue the limited partnership's activities and affairs and admit at least one (1) general partner is given by limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective; and

At least one (1) person is admitted as a general partner in accordance with the consent;

The passage of ninety (90) consecutive days after the dissociation of the limited partnership's last limited partner, unless before the end of the period the personal representative of the last remaining limited partner and all of the general partners agree, in writing or by vote, to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the admission of the personal representative of the limited partner or its nominee or designee to the limited partnership as a limited partner, effective as of the occurrence of the event that caused the last remaining limited partner to cease to be a limited partner. However, a partnership agreement may provide that the general partners or the personal representative of the last remaining limited partner is obligated to agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the administration of the personal representative of the limited partner or its nominee or designee to the limited partnership as a limited partner, effective as of the occurrence of the event that caused the last limited partner to cease to be a limited partner;

The passage of ninety (90) consecutive days during which the partnership has only one (1) partner, unless before the end of the period:

The last remaining partner admits at least one (1) person as a partner;

If the previously sole remaining partner is only a general partner, the sole remaining general partner admits at least one (1) person as a limited partner; and

If the previously sole remaining partner is only a limited partner, the sole remaining limited partner admits at least one (1) person as a general partner;

On application by a partner, the entry by the appropriate court of an order dissolving the partnership on the grounds that:

The conduct of all or substantially all of the limited partnership's activities and affairs is unlawful; or

It is not reasonably practicable to carry on the limited partnership's activities and affairs in conformity with the certificate of limited partnership and partnership agreement; or

The signing and filing of a statement of administrative dissolution by the secretary of state under § 61-3-811.

If an event occurs that imposes a deadline on a limited partnership under subsection (a) and before the limited partnership has met the requirements of the deadline, another event occurs that imposes a different deadline on the partnership under subsection (a):

The occurrence of the second event does not affect the deadline caused by the first event; and

The limited partnership's meeting of the requirements of the first deadline does not extend the second deadline.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-802. Winding Up.

A dissolved limited partnership shall wind up its activities and affairs and, except as otherwise provided in § 61-3-803, the partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.

In winding up its activities and affairs:

The limited partnership shall:

Deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissolution; and

Deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of termination stating:

The name of the limited partnership;

A statement that the limited partnership's debts, obligations, and other liabilities are discharged;

A statement that the limited partnership's activities and affairs are settled and closed;

A statement that the limited partnership's assets are distributed; and

A statement that the limited partnership is terminated;

The limited partnership may:

Preserve the limited partnership's activities, affairs, and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

Transfer the limited partnership's property;

Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration; and

Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

If a dissolved limited partnership does not have a general partner, a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's activities and affairs may be appointed by the affirmative vote or consent of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the vote or consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subsection (c):

Has the powers of a general partner under § 61-3-804 but is not liable for the debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the limited partnership solely by reason of having or exercising those powers or otherwise acting to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's activities and affairs; and

Shall promptly deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to the limited partnership's certificate of limited partnership stating:

That the limited partnership does not have a general partner;

The name and street address, including the zip code, of the person appointed, and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver mail to the street address of the person; and

That the person has been appointed pursuant to this subsection (c) to wind up the limited partnership.

On the application of a partner, the appropriate court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a dissolved limited partnership, including the appointment of a person to wind up the limited partnership's activities and affairs, if:

The limited partnership does not have a general partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has been appointed pursuant to subsection (c); or

The applicant establishes other good cause.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, § 9.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) In winding up its activities and affairs, the limited partnership:“(1) Shall discharge the limited partnership's debts, obligations, and other liabilities, settle and close the limited partnership's activities and affairs, and marshal and distribute the assets of the limited partnership; and“(2) May:“(A) Amend its certificate of limited partnership to state that the partnership is dissolved;“(B) Preserve the limited partnership's activities, affairs, and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;“(C) Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;“(D) Transfer the limited partnership's property;“(E) Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration;“(F) Deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of termination stating the name of the limited partnership and that the limited partnership is terminated; and“(G) Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-803. Rescinding dissolution.

A limited partnership may rescind its dissolution, unless a statement of termination applicable to the partnership has become effective, the court of record has entered an order under § 61-3-801(a)(6) dissolving the partnership, or the secretary of state has dissolved the partnership under § 61-3-811.

Rescinding dissolution under this section requires:

The affirmative vote or consent of each partner; and

If the limited partnership has delivered to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the limited partnership is dissolved and:

The amendment has not become effective, delivery to the secretary of state for filing of a statement of withdrawal applicable to the amendment; or

The amendment has become effective, delivery to the secretary of state for filing of an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that dissolution has been rescinded under this section.

If a limited partnership rescinds its dissolution:

The limited partnership resumes carrying on the limited partnership's activities and affairs as if dissolution had never occurred;

Subject to subdivision (c)(3), any liability incurred by the limited partnership after the dissolution and before the rescission has become effective is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

The rights of a third party arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or had notice of the rescission shall not be adversely affected.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-804. Power to bind partnership after dissolution.

A limited partnership is bound by a general partner's act after dissolution that:

Is appropriate for winding up the limited partnership's activities and affairs; or

Would have bound the partnership under § 61-3-402 before dissolution if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

A person dissociated as a general partner binds a limited partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than one (1) year has passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not know or have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner; and

The act:

Is appropriate for winding up the limited partnership's activities and affairs; or

Would have bound the limited partnership under § 61-3-402 before dissolution and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-805. Liability after dissolution of general partner and person dissociated as general partner.

If a general partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under § 61-3-804(a) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the limited partnership's activities and affairs, the general partner is liable:

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

If another general partner or a person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to that other general partner or person for any damage caused to that other general partner or person arising from the liability.

If a person dissociated as a general partner causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under § 61-3-804(b), the person is liable:

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

If a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the obligation.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-806. Known claims against dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership may give notice of a known claim under subsection (b), which has the effect provided in subsection (c).

The dissolved limited partnership shall notify the limited partnership's known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after the dissolution's effective date. The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted:

The amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date; and

Any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address, including zip code, where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than four (4) months from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved limited partnership must receive the claim; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim is barred if written notice of the claim is not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved limited partnership is barred to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved limited partnership delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subsection (b) and the claimant does not deliver a written notice of the claim to the dissolved limited partnership by the deadline; or

If the dissolved limited partnership delivered written notice to the claimant that the claimant's claim is rejected, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within three (3) months from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

For purposes of this section, written notice, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed correctly addressed and with first class postage affixed;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Twenty (20) days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark if mailed correctly addressed, and with other than first class, registered or certified postage affixed.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-807. Other claims against dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership may publish notice of the limited partnership's dissolution and request persons having claims against the partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

A notice under subsection (a) must:

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state in which the dissolved limited partnership's principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the county in which the office of the partnership's registered agent is or was last located;

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim, state that the claim must be in writing, and provide a mailing address, including zip code, to which the claim is to be sent;

State that a claim against the partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than two (2) years after publication of the notice; and

Unless the partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability limited partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the limited partnership also bars any corresponding claim against any general partner or person dissociated as a general partner that is based on § 61-3-404.

If a dissolved limited partnership publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the partnership not later than two (2) years after the publication date of the notice:

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under § 61-3-806;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the limited partnership but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the date of dissolution.

A claim not barred under this section or § 61-3-806 may be enforced:

Against the dissolved limited partnership, to the extent of the limited partnership's undistributed assets;

Except as otherwise provided in § 61-3-808, if assets of the limited partnership have been distributed after dissolution, against a partner or transferee to the extent of that person's proportionate share of the claim or of the limited partnership's assets distributed to the partner or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person's total liability for all claims under this subdivision (d)(2) must not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution; and

Against any person liable on the claim under §§ 61-3-404 and 61-3-607.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-808. Court proceedings.

A dissolved limited partnership that has published a notice under § 61-3-807 may file an application with the chancery court in the county where the limited partnership's principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, where the office of the limited partnership's registered agent is or was last located, for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the limited partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution but which, based on the facts known to the limited partnership, are reasonably expected to arise after the date of dissolution. Security is not required for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under § 61-3-807.

Not later than ten (10) days after the filing of an application under subsection (a), the dissolved limited partnership shall give notice of the proceeding to each claimant holding a contingent claim known to the limited partnership.

In a proceeding brought under this section, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, must be paid by the dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership that provides security in the amount and form ordered by the court under subsection (a) satisfies the limited partnership's obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the limited partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution, and such claims must not be enforced against a partner or transferee on account of assets received in liquidation.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-809. Liability of general partner and person dissociated as general partner when claim against limited partnership barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under § 61-3-806, § 61-3-807, or § 61-3-808, any corresponding claim under § 61-3-404 or § 61-3-607 is also barred.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-810. Disposition of assets in winding up — When contributions required.

In winding up its activities and affairs, a limited partnership shall apply the limited partnership's assets, including the contributions required by this section, to discharge the limited partnership's obligations to creditors, including partners that are creditors.

After a limited partnership complies with subsection (a), any surplus must be distributed in the following order, subject to any charging order in effect under § 61-3-703:

To each person owning a transferable interest that reflects contributions made and not previously returned, an amount equal to the value of the unreturned contributions; and

Among persons owning transferable interests in proportion to their respective rights to share in distributions immediately before the dissolution of the limited partnership.

If a limited partnership's assets are insufficient to satisfy all of its obligations under subsection (a), with respect to each unsatisfied obligation incurred when the limited partnership was not a limited liability limited partnership, the following applies:

Each person that was a general partner when the obligation was incurred and that has not been released from the obligation under § 61-3-607 shall contribute to the limited partnership for the purpose of enabling the limited partnership to satisfy the obligation. The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of a general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred;

If a person does not contribute the full amount required under subdivision (c)(1) with respect to an unsatisfied obligation of the limited partnership, the other persons required to contribute by subdivision (c)(1) on account of the obligation shall contribute the additional amount necessary to discharge the obligation. The additional contribution due from each of those other persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of a general partner in effect for each of those other persons when the obligation was incurred; and

If a person does not make the additional contribution required by subdivision (c)(2), further additional contributions are determined and due in the same manner as provided in subdivision (c)(2).

A person that makes an additional contribution under subdivision (c)(2) or (3) may recover from any person whose failure to contribute under subdivision (c)(1) or (2) necessitated the additional contribution. A person shall not recover under this subsection (d) more than the amount additionally contributed. A person's liability under this subsection (d) must not exceed the amount the person failed to contribute.

If a limited partnership does not have sufficient surplus to comply with subdivision (b)(1), any surplus must be distributed among the owners of transferable interests in proportion to the value of the respective unreturned contributions.

All distributions made under subsections (b) and (c) must be paid in money.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-811. Administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under subsection (b) to dissolve a limited partnership administratively if:

The limited partnership fails to pay any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid to the secretary of state;

The limited partnership fails to deliver an annual report to the secretary of state not later than two (2) months after the report is due;

The limited partnership is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

The limited partnership does not notify the secretary of state within two (2) months that the limited partnership's registered agent or registered office has been changed, that the limited partnership's registered agent has resigned, or that the limited partnership's registered office has been discontinued;

The limited partnership submits to the secretary of state a check, bank draft, money order, or other such instrument, for payment of any fee and the instrument is dishonored upon presentation for payment;

A general or limited partner or other representative of a limited partnership signed a document the person knew was false in any material respect, with the intent that the document be filed with the secretary of state; or

The name of the limited partnership in any document filed under this chapter fails to comply with § 61-3-112.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist for administratively dissolving a limited partnership, the secretary of state must serve the partnership with notice in a record of the secretary of state's determination. The record may be sent by first class mail.

If a limited partnership, not later than two (2) months after service of the notice under subsection (b), does not cure or demonstrate to the satisfaction of the secretary of state the nonexistence of each ground determined by the secretary of state, the secretary of state must administratively dissolve the partnership by signing a statement of administrative dissolution that recites the grounds for dissolution and the effective date of dissolution. The secretary of state shall file the statement and serve a copy on the partnership pursuant to § 61-3-119, except that the statement of administrative dissolution may be sent by first class mail.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved continues in existence as an entity but may not carry on any activities except as necessary to wind up the limited partnership's activities and affairs and liquidate its assets under §§ 61-3-802, 61-3-806, 61-3-807, 61-3-808, and 61-3-810, or to apply for reinstatement under § 61-3-812.

The administrative dissolution of a limited partnership does not terminate the authority of the limited partnership's registered agent.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-812. Reinstatement.

A limited partnership that is administratively dissolved under § 61-3-811 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement following the administrative dissolution. The application must:

Be accompanied by a confirmation of good standing with the department of revenue relative to the limited partnership;

State the name of the limited partnership at the time of the limited partnership's administrative dissolution;

State a name for the limited partnership that satisfies § 61-3-112; and

State that the grounds for dissolution did not exist or have been eliminated.

If the secretary of state determines that the application is accompanied by the confirmation of good standing with the department of revenue and contains the information required by subsection (a), and that the information is correct, then the secretary of state must cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the limited partnership. Service of the copy may be by first class mail.

If the limited partnership name in subdivision (a)(2) is different than the limited partnership name in subdivision (a)(3), the application for reinstatement must constitute an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership insofar as it pertains to the limited partnership's name.

When reinstatement is effective, reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution, and the limited partnership resumes carrying on the limited partnership's business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 10, 11.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment inserted “with the department of revenue” following “good standing” in (a)(1) and (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-813. Judicial review of denial of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies a limited partnership's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the secretary of state must serve the limited partnership with a notice in a record that explains the reasons for the denial.

A limited partnership may seek judicial review of a denial of reinstatement in the chancery court of Davidson County not later than thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-814. Statement of termination following administrative dissolution.

When a limited partnership has been administratively dissolved and wishes to terminate its existence, it may do so without first being reinstated by delivering a statement of termination to the secretary of state for filing following administrative dissolution, stating the name of the limited partnership and that the limited partnership is terminated.

The secretary of state shall file the statement of termination following administrative dissolution if the secretary of state finds that the statement of termination complies with subsection (a) and the limited partnership is in good standing with the department of revenue.

Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 12.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-815. Statement of termination.

When a limited partnership has been dissolved and wishes to terminate its existence, it may do so by delivering a statement of termination to the secretary of state for filing and include the information described in § 61-3-802(b)(1)(B) and the secretary of state control number.

The secretary of state shall file the statement of termination if the secretary of state finds that the statement of termination complies with subsection (a) and the limited partnership is in good standing with the department of revenue.

Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 12.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.